Maine, session 132, LD1581.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §523, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 634, §8, is further
amended to read:
2. Disabled veterans; special free license plates. The Secretary of State, on
application and upon evidence of payment of the excise tax required by Title 36, section
1482 or upon evidence of exemption from excise tax under Title 36, section 1483,
subsection 12, shall issue, with no annual registration fee, a registration certificate and upon
request special designating plates to be used in lieu of regular registration plates for a
vehicle with a registered gross weight of not more than 26,000 pounds to any 100%
disabled veteran when that application is accompanied by certification from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or any branch of the United States Armed Forces as
to the veteran's permanent disability and receipt of 100% service-connected benefits. Upon
request a disability placard may be issued at no fee. The Secretary of State may issue a
registration certificate and special designating plates for no more than one vehicle 3
vehicles owned by a veteran eligible under this subsection.
These special designating plates must bear the words "Disabled Veteran," which indicate
that the vehicle is owned by a disabled veteran.
Page 1 - 132LR0814(03)

Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1483, sub-§12, as amended by PL 2021, c. 240, §1, is further
amended to read:
12. Certain veterans. Automobiles owned by veterans who are granted free
registration of those vehicles by the Secretary of State under Title 29‑A, section 523,
subsection 1 or 2 or who are disabled by injury or disease incurred or aggravated during
active military service in the line of duty and are receiving any form of pension or
compensation from the United States Government for total, service-connected disability.
A maximum of 3 automobiles owned by a veteran are exempt from the excise tax. In order
for an automobile to qualify for an exemption from the excise tax under this subsection,
the name of the qualifying veteran must appear on the automobile's certificate of title. If
there are multiple owners of an automobile, at least one of the owners whose name appears
on the certificate of title must meet the requirements of this subsection in order for the
automobile to qualify for the exemption;
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0814(03)